Arkansas, session 2025, SB355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-54-102 is amended to read as
follows:
5-54-102. Obstructing governmental operations.
(a) A person commits the offense of obstructing governmental
operations if the person:
(1) Knowingly obstructs, impairs, or hinders the performance of
any governmental function;
(2) Knowingly refuses to provide information requested by an
employee of a governmental agency relating to the investigation of a case
brought under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.,
and is the physical custodian of the child in the case;
(3) Fails to submit to court-ordered scientific testing by a
noninvasive procedure to determine the paternity of a child in a case brought
under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.; or
(4) Falsely identifies himself or herself to a law enforcement
officer or a code enforcement officer; or
(5) Having received in person service of a subpoena issued by a
judge or a court clerk, knowingly fails to appear to testify at a trial or
*CEB196*
03-20-2025 09:44:50 CEB196

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB355
court hearing in a criminal matter.
(b)(1) Obstructing governmental operations by using or threatening to
use physical force is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) A second or subsequent offense of obstructing governmental
operations under subdivision (a)(4) of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) The offense of obstructing governmental operations under
subdivision (a)(5) of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.
(4) Otherwise, obstructing governmental operations is a Class C
misdemeanor.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(1) Unlawful flight by a person charged with an offense;
(2) Refusal to submit to arrest;
(3) Any means of avoiding compliance with the law not involving
affirmative interference with a governmental function unless specifically set
forth in this section; or
(4) Obstruction, impairment, or hindrance of what a person
reasonably believes is a public servant's unlawful action.
(d)(1) As used in this section, “code enforcement officer” means an
individual charged with the duty of enforcing a municipal code, municipal
ordinance, or municipal regulation as defined by a municipal code, municipal
ordinance, or municipal regulation.
(2) “Code enforcement officer” includes a municipal animal
control officer.

/s/J. Bryant











03-20-2025 09:44:50 CEB196